Louisiana, session 2026, HB541.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:71(A)(3)(d) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§71. Permits required; fees; exception
A. Except as provided in Subsections B and C of this Section, before
engaging in the business of manufacturing, supplying, or dealing in alcoholic
beverages, all persons shall obtain from the commissioner, according to established
rules and regulations, a permit to conduct each separate business and shall pay the
commissioner a fee not to exceed the amounts provided for in the following schedule
and in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act for each year the permit is valid:
* * *
(3) Retailers - (a) There shall be three types of Class A retail liquor permits:
* * *
(d)(i) Microdistiller, which authorizes the holder of a Retailers Class A
permit to engage in the distilling, making, blending, rectifying, or processing of any
alcoholic beverage in Louisiana this state at a single location in an amount not to
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1151 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 541
exceed twelve thousand gallons per year, and which further authorizes the sale at
retail of such distilled beverages from that location - one thousand dollars.
(ii) Microdistiller, which authorizes the holder of a Retailers Class A permit
to engage in the distilling, making, blending, rectifying, or processing of any
alcoholic beverage in this state at a single location in an amount not to exceed one
thousand gallons per year, and which further authorizes the sale at retail of such
distilled beverages from that location - one hundred dollars.
* * *